Utah statutes.
73-10-15.   State water plan -- Agencies to cooperate in formulation of plan.

All other state agencies shall cooperate with the Division of Water Resources in the formulation of a state water plan and the division is to use information, including water resources data, which has been or will be assembled by other state agencies, the United States government, various colleges and universities of the state, or any other source which can profitably contribute to the development of a state water plan.



Amended by Chapter 176, 1967 General Session

